Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB522.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5422YC (4) 91 sb/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 476.53, subsection 3, paragraph c, 1 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 (2) The rate-regulated public utility has demonstrated to 3 the commission that the public utility has considered other 4 sources for long-term electric supply and that the facility or 5 lease is reasonable when compared to other feasible alternative 6 sources of supply. The rate-regulated public utility shall 7 provide support of reasonability with an electric utility 8 resource plan pursuant to section 476.53B that has been updated 9 no more than twenty-four months prior to the filing of the 10 public utilityâs application. 11 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 476.53B Electric utility resource 12 planning. 13 1. An electric utility required to be rate-regulated by the 14 commission shall file a resource plan at least once every three 15 years. A resource plan shall consider all reasonable resources 16 proposed by the utility for meeting the probable future 17 demand for energy, including supply resources and conservation 18 and management of demand to meet the utilityâs probable 19 future demand over five-year and twenty-year horizons. For 20 conservation and management of demand, an electric utilityâs 21 resource plan shall include programs approved in the electric 22 utilityâs most recent energy efficiency plan approved by the 23 commission under section 476.6, subsection 15. The objectives 24 of a resource plan include but are not limited to adequate, 25 reasonable, and reliable energy service considering costs, 26 fuel diversity, and probable future demand for energy. A 27 resource plan shall not require a specific outcome or specific 28 investment decisions, but an electric utility shall include 29 proposed resource additions for each scenario studied. A 30 resource plan shall reflect the circumstances and management 31 judgment of an electric utility. This section does not 32 restrict an electric utility from making planning decisions 33 based on future resource needs subject to the ratemaking 34 oversight of the commission, as described in section 476.53, 35 -1- LSB 5422YC (4) 91 sb/js 1/ 3 H.F. _____ subsection 3. 1 2. The commission shall review a resource plan. Within 2 ninety days of filing the final resource plan, the commission 3 shall issue an order acknowledging it has received the plan. 4 In the order acknowledging receipt, the commission may provide 5 recommendations to an electric utility regarding any additional 6 analyses or actions that the electric utility shall include in 7 its next resource plan. 8 3. The commission shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 9 regarding the timeline and stakeholder process to review and 10 provide comments on a resource plan. The stakeholder process 11 shall include the electric utility organizing and facilitating 12 stakeholder conferences for the resource plan, providing 13 reasonable access to data, and providing the opportunity for 14 stakeholders to provide comments during the planâs development 15 and after the plan is submitted to the commission. The 16 stakeholder conferences shall include representatives from 17 the commission, the consumer advocate, the electric utilityâs 18 customers, and the state load forecasting center. The electric 19 utility may inform and consider input from the commission, the 20 consumer advocate, stakeholders, and the state load forecasting 21 center. In addition to participating in the stakeholder 22 conferences, the state load forecasting center may provide 23 technical assistance to other stakeholders. 24